Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; ELECTRONIC LIBRARY FOR MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Electronic library for Minnesota. new text end new text begin For statewide licenses to online databases selected in cooperation with the Minnesota Office of Higher Education for school media centers, public libraries, state government agency libraries, and public or private college or university libraries: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,900,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,900,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end